Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,214
Snowmobiles; registration; exemptions.

No registration shall be required for snowmobiles:

(1) Owned and used by the United States, another state, or a political subdivision thereof;

(2) Registered in a country other than the United States and temporarily used within this state;

(3) Covered by a valid license of another state and which have not been within this state for more than thirty consecutive days; and

(4) Which are operated only on land owned or leased by the owner thereof.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 214.